Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 7

Merger, Conversion and Transfer of Assets

48-249-701. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Domestic entity” means any entity formed under the laws of this state;

“Foreign entity” means any entity formed under the laws of any state of the United States other than this state, the laws of the United States or the laws of any foreign country or other foreign jurisdiction; and

“Other entity” and “another entity” mean any domestic entity, other than a domestic LLC, or foreign entity, whether formed under the laws of this state, the laws of any other state, the laws of the United States or the laws of any foreign country or other foreign jurisdiction.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-702. Merger.

General. One (1) or more domestic LLCs may, under an agreement or plan of merger, merge with or into one (1) or more domestic LLCs or other entities by complying with this section. Any constituent party to the merger may be the surviving entity, as the agreement or plan of merger shall provide.

Compliance with other applicable law. If any constituent party to a merger is a foreign entity, the merger shall be permitted under the laws of the jurisdiction of the foreign entity, and the foreign entity shall comply with such laws. If any constituent party to a merger is a domestic entity, the merger shall be permitted under the other laws of this state that apply to the domestic entity, and the domestic entity shall comply with such laws. Notwithstanding the absence of any express provision in the Revised Uniform Partnership Act, compiled in title 61, chapter 1, permitting or authorizing a partnership formed under that act to merge with or into an LLC, a partnership formed under the Revised Uniform Partnership Act is authorized to merge with or into one (1) or more LLCs, upon the approval by all of the partners of the partnership or by the number or percentage of partners specified for merger in the partnership agreement of the partnership.

Approval.

The agreement or plan of merger shall be approved on behalf of any domestic LLC that is a constituent party to the merger, by:

A majority vote of the managers, if the LLC is a manager-managed LLC, or a majority vote of the directors, if the LLC is a director-managed LLC; and

A majority vote of the members, whether the LLC is a member-managed LLC, a manager-managed LLC or a director-managed LLC.

In the event a domestic LLC merges with or into a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership and the partnership or limited partnership is the surviving entity, the agreement or plan of merger shall be subject to the approval of any member or holder of the domestic LLC who, at the effective date or time of the merger, becomes a partner of the domestic or foreign partnership or a general partner of the domestic or foreign limited partnership, as applicable.

Merger consideration. In connection with a merger under this section, rights or securities of, or other equity interests in, a domestic LLC or other entity that is a constituent party to the merger may be exchanged for or converted into cash, property, rights or securities of, or interests in, the surviving domestic LLC or other entity, or, in addition to or in lieu of that merger consideration, may be exchanged for or converted into cash, property, rights or securities of or interests in a domestic LLC or other entity that is not the surviving domestic LLC or other surviving entity in the merger.

Certificate of merger. A domestic LLC merging under this section shall file a certificate of merger with the secretary of state. The certificate of merger shall state the following:

The name and jurisdiction of each constituent party to the merger;

That an agreement or plan of merger has been approved and executed by each constituent party to the merger;

The name of the surviving constituent party;

In the case of a merger in which a domestic LLC is the surviving entity, such amendments, if any, to the articles of organization of the surviving domestic LLC as are desired to be effected by the merger;

The future effective date or time of the merger, if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of merger;

That the agreement or plan of merger is on file at a place of business of the surviving constituent party, and the address of that place of business;

That a copy of the agreement or plan of merger shall be furnished by the surviving constituent party, on request and without cost, to any person holding an interest in a constituent party to the merger; and

If the surviving entity is a foreign entity, a statement that the surviving foreign entity agrees that it may be served with process in this state in any proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any domestic LLC that is a constituent party to the merger, irrevocably appointing the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in any such proceeding, and specifying the address to which a copy of such process shall be mailed to it by the secretary of state. In the event of service under this subdivision (e)(8) upon the secretary of state, the procedures set forth in § 48-249-113 shall be applicable, except that the plaintiff in any such proceeding shall furnish the secretary of state with the address specified in the certificate of merger provided for in this subdivision (e)(8), and any other address that the plaintiff may elect to furnish, together with copies of the process as required by the secretary of state, and the secretary of state shall notify the surviving other entity at all the addresses furnished by the plaintiff, in accordance with the procedures set forth in § 48-249-113.

Effective time. Unless a future effective date or time is provided in a certificate of merger, in which event a merger shall be effective at that future effective date or time, a merger shall be effective upon filing a certificate of merger with the secretary of state.

Effect on nonsurviving domestic LLC. A certificate of merger, as filed with the secretary of state, shall act as notice of dissolution and articles of termination for a domestic LLC that is not the surviving entity in the merger. A merger of a domestic LLC, including a domestic LLC that is not the surviving entity in the merger, shall not require the domestic LLC to wind up its affairs under § 48-249-610, or to pay its liabilities and distribute its assets under § 48-249-620.

Amendment of articles of organization. A certificate of merger that sets forth any amendment, in accordance with subdivision (e)(4), shall be deemed to be an amendment to the articles of organization of the surviving domestic LLC, and the surviving domestic LLC shall not be required to take any further action to amend its articles of organization under § 48-249-204, with respect to the amendments set forth in the certificate of merger.

Amendment of operating agreement. An agreement or plan of merger approved in accordance with subsection (c) may effect any amendment to the operating agreement of the surviving LLC in the merger, or the adoption of a new operating agreement for the surviving LLC in the merger; provided, that the amendment or new operating agreement receives the approval required for amendment of the operating agreement under § 48-249-204(c). Any amendment to an operating agreement or adoption of a new operating agreement made pursuant to this subsection (i) shall be effective at the effective date and time of the merger.

Effect of merger. When any merger has become effective under this section, for all purposes of the laws of this state:

All of the rights, privileges and powers of each constituent party to the merger and all property, real, personal and mixed, of, and all debts due to, any constituent party to the merger, as well as all other things and causes of action belonging to each constituent party to the merger, shall be vested in the surviving constituent party, and thereafter shall be the property of the surviving constituent party as they were of each constituent party to the merger prior to the merger;

The title to any real property vested, by deed or otherwise, in any constituent party to the merger shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of this section;

All rights of creditors, and all liens upon any property of any constituent party to the merger, shall be preserved unimpaired;

All debts, liabilities and obligations of each of the constituent parties that have merged shall thenceforth attach to the surviving constituent party and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if the debts, liabilities and obligations had been incurred or contracted by it; and

A proceeding pending against an entity that is a constituent party to the merger may be continued as if the merger had not occurred, or the surviving entity may be substituted as a party for any entity whose existence ceased in the merger.

Abandonment of merger.

After an agreement or plan of merger has been approved as required by this section, and at any time before the merger has become effective, the merger may be abandoned, subject to any contractual rights, by any entity that is a constituent party to the merger, in accordance with the procedures set forth in the agreement or plan of merger, or, if no such procedures are set forth in the agreement or plan of merger by:

Any domestic LLC that is a constituent party to the merger, in a manner determined by the members with respect to a member-managed LLC, by the managers with respect to a manager-managed LLC, or by the directors with respect to a director-managed LLC; and

Another entity that is a constituent party to the merger in accordance with applicable law with respect to the other entity.

If the merger is abandoned after the certificate of merger has been filed with the secretary of state, but before the merger has become effective, a statement, executed by each constituent party to the merger, stating that the merger has been abandoned in accordance with the agreement or plan of merger or this section, shall be filed with the secretary of state prior to the effectiveness of the merger.

Nonexclusivity. This section is nonexclusive. A domestic LLC may be merged in any other manner provided by law.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, §§ 37-39.

48-249-703. Conversion to LLC.

General. Any other entity may convert to a domestic LLC, by complying with this section and by filing with the secretary of state:

A certificate of conversion to a domestic LLC; and

Articles of organization that comply with § 48-249-202.

Contents of certificate of conversion. The certificate of conversion to a domestic LLC shall state the following:

The jurisdiction, date of formation and type of entity of the converting other entity immediately prior to its conversion to a domestic LLC;

The name of the converting other entity immediately prior to the filing of the certificate of conversion to a domestic LLC;

The name of the domestic LLC, as set forth in its articles of organization filed in accordance with subsection (a);

That all required approvals of the conversion have been obtained by the converting other entity; and

The future effective date or time of the conversion to a domestic LLC, if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of conversion to a domestic LLC and the articles of organization.

Status of converted entity. Upon the filing of the certificate of conversion to a domestic LLC and the articles of organization of the domestic LLC with the secretary of state, or upon the future effective date or time of the certificate of conversion to a domestic LLC and the articles of organization of the domestic LLC, the other entity shall be converted into a domestic LLC, and the domestic LLC shall thereafter be subject to all of this chapter, except that, notwithstanding § 48-249-201, the existence of the domestic LLC shall be deemed to have commenced on the date the other entity commenced its existence in the jurisdiction in which the other entity was first formed.

Result of conversion. The conversion of any other entity into a domestic LLC shall not be deemed to affect any debts, liabilities, and obligations of the other entity incurred prior to its conversion to a domestic LLC, or the personal liability of any person incurred prior to the conversion.

Effects of conversion. When any conversion of another entity to a domestic LLC has become effective under this section, for all purposes of the laws of this state:

The domestic LLC shall be deemed to be the same entity as the converting other entity;

All of the rights, privileges and powers of the converting other entity and all property, real, personal and mixed, of, and all debts due to, the converting other entity, as well as all other things and causes of action belonging to the converting other entity, shall be and remain vested in the domestic LLC and shall be the property of the domestic LLC;

The title to any real property vested by deed, or otherwise, in the converting other entity shall not revert, or be in any way impaired, by reason of this section;

All rights of creditors, and all liens upon any property of the converting other entity, shall be preserved unimpaired;

All debts, liabilities and obligations of the converting other entity shall remain attached to the domestic LLC, and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if the debts, liabilities and obligations had originally been incurred or contracted by it in its capacity as a domestic LLC;

Any proceeding pending against the converting other entity may be continued against the domestic LLC as if the conversion had not occurred; and

The rights, privileges, powers and interests in property of the converting other entity, as well as the debts, liabilities and obligations of the converting other entity, shall not be deemed, as a consequence of the conversion, to have been transferred to the domestic LLC for any purpose of the laws of this state.

No dissolution or winding up. The converting other entity shall not be required to wind up its affairs or to pay its liabilities and distribute its assets. The conversion shall not be deemed to constitute a dissolution of the converting other entity, and shall constitute a continuation of the existence of the converting other entity in the form of a domestic LLC.

Compliance with other applicable law. If the converting other entity is a foreign entity, the conversion shall be permitted under the laws of the jurisdiction of the converting other entity, and the converting other entity shall comply with such laws. If the converting other entity is a domestic entity, the conversion shall be permitted under the other laws of this state that apply to the domestic entity, and the domestic entity shall comply with such laws. Notwithstanding the absence of any express provision in the Revised Uniform Partnership Act, compiled in title 61, chapter 1, or the Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, compiled in title 61, chapter 2, permitting or authorizing a partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Partnership Act or a limited partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act to convert to an LLC, each of a partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Partnership Act and a limited partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act is authorized to convert to an LLC upon the approval by all of the partners of the partnership or limited partnership, as applicable, or by the number or percentage of partners specified for conversion in the partnership agreement of the partnership or the limited partnership agreement of the limited partnership, as applicable.

Approval. Prior to filing a certificate of conversion of another entity to a domestic LLC with the secretary of state:

The conversion shall be approved in the manner provided by any document, instrument, agreement or other writing governing the internal affairs of the converting other entity and the conduct of its business, as appropriate, and if:

The converting other entity is a partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Partnership Act, or a limited partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, in the manner provided for in subsection (g); or

The converting other entity is other than a partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Partnership Act, or a limited partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, in the manner provided by applicable laws of the jurisdiction of the converting other entity; and

The articles of organization and operating agreement, as applicable, for the domestic LLC, shall be approved by the same authorization required for the converting other entity to approve the conversion.

Exchange or conversion of interests. In connection with a conversion of another entity to a domestic LLC under this section, rights or securities of or interests in the converting other entity may be exchanged for or converted into cash, property or rights or securities of or interests in the domestic LLC, or, in addition to or in lieu of such exchange or conversion, may be exchanged for or converted into cash, property or rights or securities of or interests in another domestic LLC or other entity, or may be cancelled.

Nonexclusivity. This section is nonexclusive. Any other entity may be converted to a domestic LLC in any other manner provided by law.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, §§ 40-42.

48-249-704. Conversion of LLC.

General. Upon compliance with this section, a domestic LLC may convert to another entity, by filing with the secretary of state:

A certificate of conversion, pursuant to subsection (f); and

If the other entity into which the domestic LLC is to be converted is an entity formed under the laws of this state, the formational document, if any, required to be filed with the secretary of state by other laws of this state in connection with the formation of the other domestic entity, which formational document has been executed in accordance with the applicable law of this state with respect to such formational document.

Compliance with other applicable law. If the domestic LLC is to be converted into a foreign entity, the conversion shall be permitted under the laws of the jurisdiction of the foreign entity, and the foreign entity shall comply with such laws. If the domestic LLC is to be converted into a domestic entity, other than a domestic LLC, the conversion shall be permitted under the other laws of this state that apply to the domestic entity, and the domestic entity shall comply with such laws. Notwithstanding the absence of any express provision in the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in chapters 11-27 of this title, the Revised Uniform Partnership Act, compiled in title 61, chapter 1, or the Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, compiled in title 61, chapter 2, permitting or authorizing an LLC to convert to a corporation formed pursuant to the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, a partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Partnership Act, or a limited partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, an LLC is authorized to convert to a corporation formed pursuant to the Business Corporation Act, a partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Partnership Act, or a limited partnership formed pursuant to the Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act.

Approval.

The conversion of a domestic LLC to another entity shall be approved by:

A majority vote of the managers, if the LLC is a manager-managed LLC, or a majority vote of the directors, if the LLC is a director-managed LLC; and

A majority vote of the members, whether the LLC is a member-managed LLC, a manager-managed LLC or a director-managed LLC.

In the event a domestic LLC converts to a domestic or foreign partnership or to a domestic or foreign limited partnership, the conversion shall be subject to the approval of any member or holder of the domestic LLC who, at the effective date or time of the conversion, becomes a partner of the domestic or foreign partnership or a general partner of the domestic or foreign limited partnership, as applicable.

Winding up not required. The conversion of a domestic LLC to another entity, in accordance with this section, shall not require the domestic LLC to wind up its affairs under § 48-249-610, or to pay its liabilities and distribute its assets under § 48-249-620.

Exchange or conversion of interests. In connection with the conversion of a domestic LLC to another entity, in accordance with this section, rights or securities of or interests in the domestic LLC may be exchanged for, or converted into cash, property, rights or securities of or interests in, the other entity into which the domestic LLC is being converted, or, in addition to or in lieu of such exchange or conversion, may be exchanged for or converted into cash, property, rights or securities of or interests in another entity, or may be cancelled.

Contents of certificate of conversion. The certificate of conversion shall state the following:

The name of the domestic LLC, and, if it has been changed, the name under which its articles of organization were originally filed;

The date of filing of the original articles of organization of the domestic LLC with the secretary of state;

The name of the other entity into which the domestic LLC is to be converted, and the jurisdiction and type of entity of the other entity;

The future effective date or time of the conversion, if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of conversion;

That all required approvals of the conversion have been obtained by the domestic LLC; and

If the domestic LLC is converted to a foreign entity, a statement that the foreign entity agrees that it may be served with process in this state in any proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of the domestic LLC arising prior to the date of the conversion, irrevocably appointing the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in any such proceeding, and specifying the address to which a copy of such process shall be mailed to it by the secretary of state. In the event of service under this subdivision (f)(6) upon the secretary of state, the procedures set forth in § 48-249-113 shall be applicable, except that the plaintiff in any such proceeding shall furnish the secretary of state with the address specified in the certificate of conversion provided for in this subdivision (f)(6), and any other address that the plaintiff may elect to furnish, together with copies of the process as required by the secretary of state, and the secretary of state shall notify the converted entity at all the addresses furnished by the plaintiff in accordance with the procedures set forth in § 48-249-113.

Result of conversion. The conversion of a domestic LLC to another entity in accordance with this section, and the resulting cessation of its existence as a domestic LLC pursuant to a certificate of conversion, shall not be deemed to affect any debts, liabilities and obligations of the domestic LLC incurred prior to the conversion or the personal liability of any person incurred prior to the conversion, nor shall it be deemed to affect the law applicable to the domestic LLC with respect to matters arising prior to the conversion.

Effects of conversion. When any conversion of a domestic LLC to another entity has become effective under this section, for all purposes of the laws of this state:

The converted other entity shall be deemed to be the same entity as the domestic LLC;

All of the rights, privileges and powers of the domestic LLC and all property, real, personal and mixed, of and all debts due to the domestic LLC, as well as all other things and causes of action belonging to the domestic LLC, shall be and remain vested in the converted other entity, and shall be the property of the converted other entity;

The title to any real property vested by deed or otherwise in the domestic LLC shall not revert, or be in any way impaired, by reason of this section;

All rights of creditors, and all liens upon any property of the domestic LLC, shall be preserved unimpaired;

All debts, liabilities and obligations of the domestic LLC shall remain attached to the converted other entity, and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if the debts, liabilities and obligations had originally been incurred or contracted by it in its capacity as the converted other entity;

Any proceeding pending against the domestic LLC may be continued against the converted other entity as if the conversion had not occurred; and

The rights, privileges, powers and interests in property of the domestic LLC, as well as the debts, liabilities and obligations of the domestic LLC, shall not be deemed, as a consequence of the conversion, to have been transferred to the converted other entity for any purpose of the laws of this state.

Nonexclusivity. This section is nonexclusive. Any domestic LLC may be converted to another entity in any other manner provided by law.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, §§ 43-45.

48-249-705. Transfer of assets not in the ordinary course.

Approval of transfer. The sale, lease, transfer or other disposition by an LLC of all, or substantially all, of its property and assets not in the usual and regular course of business shall be approved by:

A majority vote of the managers, if the LLC is a manager-managed LLC, or a majority vote of the directors, if the LLC is a director-managed LLC; and

A majority vote of the members, whether the LLC is a member-managed LLC, a manager-managed LLC or a director-managed LLC.

Liability of transferee. The transferee of assets under this section is liable for the debts, obligations and liabilities of the transferor, only to the extent provided in the contract or agreement between the transferee and the transferor, with respect to the transfer of assets or to the extent provided by this chapter or other applicable law.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-706. Contractual appraisal rights.

The LLC documents, or an agreement or plan of merger, may provide that contractual appraisal rights, with respect to a membership interest, financial rights or another interest in the LLC, shall be available for any class or group of members or holders of financial rights in the LLC, in connection with any amendment of the LLC documents, any merger in which the LLC is a constituent party to the merger, any conversion of the LLC to another entity, any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition by the LLC of all or substantially all of its property and assets not in the usual and regular course of business, or any other action or event affecting the LLC.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.